Tennessee, session 114, HB1273.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 17, Part 3, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) As used in this section:
(1) "Child care agency" means the same as defined in § 71-3-501;
(2) "Mass violence" means the same as defined in § 39-16-517(a);
(3) "Means of communication" means the same as defined in § 39-16-
517(a); and
(4) "Property" means any building, motor vehicle, grounds, recreational
area, athletic field, or other property owned, used, or operated by the child care
agency, preschool, or religious institution.
(b)
(1) A person who recklessly, by any means of communication, threatens
to commit an act of mass violence on the property of a child care agency,
preschool, or religious institution commits a Class E felony.
(2) This section does not apply to a person with an intellectual disability,
as defined in § 52-1-101.
(c) As a condition of bail or other pretrial release, the court may, in its discretion,
order the defendant to undergo an evaluation, under § 33-7-301, to determine whether
the defendant poses a substantial likelihood of serious harm to the defendant or others.
HB1273
002327
- 1 -

(d)
(1) Any person who has knowledge of a threat of mass violence on the
property of a child care agency, preschool, or religious institution shall report the
threat immediately to:
(A) The local law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the
property; and
(B) The child care agency, preschool, or religious institution that
is subject to the threat of mass violence.
(2) The report must include, to the extent known by the reporter, the
nature of the threat of mass violence, the name and address of the person
making the threat, the facts requiring the report, and any other pertinent
information.
(3) Any person who has knowledge of a threat of mass violence on the
property of a child care agency, preschool, or religious institution and knowingly
fails to report the threat commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(e) In addition to any other penalty authorized by law, a sentencing court may
order a person convicted under subsection (b) to pay restitution, including costs and
damages resulting from the disruption of the normal activity that would have otherwise
occurred on the property of the child care agency, preschool, or religious institution but
for the threat to commit an act of mass violence.
(f) If a juvenile is adjudicated delinquent for a violation of subsection (b) pursuant
to title 37, chapter 1, part 1, then the disposition must include, in addition to any other
disposition authorized by law, the suspension of the juvenile's driving privileges or ability
to obtain a driver license for a period of one (1) year in accordance with the procedure
set out in title 55, chapter 10, part 7.
- 2 - 002327

SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 3 - 002327